North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-10 Petroleum Products [Repealed]

19-10-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, §§ 3, 13; 1925 Supp., §§ 3080a3, 3080a13; S.L. 1933, ch. 165, §§ 1, 3; 1939, ch. 148, §§ 1, 3, 4; R.C. 1943, § 19-1001; S.L. 1977, ch. 197, § 1; 1989, ch. 264, § 10; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 213, § 1; 2011, ch. 460, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-02.
Department to enforce law — Regulation of petroleum products. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 3080a2; S.L. 1939, ch. 148, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 19-1002; S.L. 1981, ch. 336, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-03.
Sale of adulterated and misbranded gasoline, kerosene, tractor fuel, heating oil, diesel fuel, or lubricating oil prohibited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 3080a3; S.L. 1933, ch. 165, § 1; 1939, ch. 148, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 19-1003; S.L. 1977, ch. 197, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-03.1.
Retail sale of alcohol-blended gasoline — Label requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 263, § 1; 1987, ch. 267, § 1; 1999, ch. 216, § 1; 2007, ch. 214, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-03.2.
Retail sale of gasoline containing methyl tertiary butyl ether — Restriction.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 200, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-03.3.
Retail sale of alternative fuels — Notice required. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 213, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-04.
Labeling gasoline containers — Gasoline pipeline. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 3080a4; S.L. 1935, ch. 147, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 19-1004; S.L. 1953, ch. 154, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-1004; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-05.
Labeling kerosene — Containers — Pipeline. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 3080a4; S.L. 1935, ch. 147, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 19-1005; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-06.
Labeling tractor fuel. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 165, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 19-1006; S.L. 1953, ch. 154, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-1006; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-07.
Labeling heating oil. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 148, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 19-1007; S.L. 1953, ch. 154, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-1007; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-08.
Labeling diesel fuel. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 148, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 19-1008; S.L. 1953, ch. 154, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-1008; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-09.
Specifications — Gasoline and kerosene. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1951, ch. 154, § 2.

19-10-10.
Specifications for petroleum products — Tests used. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 3080a5; R.C. 1943, § 19-1010; S.L. 1951, ch. 154, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-1010; S.L. 1977, ch. 197, § 3; 2007, ch. 213, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-11.
Specifications — Tractor fuel. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1951, ch. 154, § 2.

19-10-12.
Specifications — Diesel fuel. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1951, ch. 154, § 2.

19-10-13.
Specifications — Heating oil. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1951, ch. 154, § 2.

19-10-14.
How heating oil specifications modified. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1951, ch. 154, § 2.

19-10-15.
How volume of heating oil determined. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 148, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 19-1015; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-16.
Department may prohibit sale of certain gasolines or motor fuels. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 177, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 19-1016; S.L. 1989, ch. 264, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-17.
Coloring of gasoline. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 168, § 1.

19-10-18.
Sale of prohibited gasolines — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 177, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 19-1018; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 180; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-19.
Inspection fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, §§ 6, 7; 1925 Supp., §§ 3080a6, 3080a7; S.L. 1933, ch. 165, §§ 4, 5; 1939, ch. 148, §§ 7, 8; R.C. 1943, § 19-1019; S.L. 1973, ch. 36, § 6; 1989, ch. 270, § 1; 1997, ch. 207, § 1; 2009, ch. 193, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-20.
Report to tax commissioner of petroleum products — Contents. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 6; 1925 Supp., § 3080a6; S.L. 1933, ch. 165, § 4; 1939, ch. 148, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 19-1020; S.L. 1989, ch. 270, § 2; 2009, ch. 193, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-21.
Bond may be required of dealer in petroleum products. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 3080a7; S.L. 1933, ch. 165, § 5; 1939, ch. 148, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 19-1021; S.L. 1975, ch. 197, § 1; 1985, ch. 258, § 32; 1987, ch. 263, § 12; 1989, ch. 270, § 3; 2009, ch. 193, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-22.
Department may designate ports of entry and hold cars for inspection — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 3080a2; R.C. 1943, § 19-1022; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 181; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

19-10-22.1.
Aboveground storage tanks permitted — Limitations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 218, § 10.

19-10-23.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 223, § 11; 1925 Supp., § 3080a11; S.L. 1939, ch. 148, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 19-1023; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 182; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.